Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2628.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3118. Mobile work zone safety enforcement systems in lane-restricted work zones.(a) Short title.--This section shall be known and may be cited as Josh's Law.(b) Establishment of program.--A program is established within the department to provide for the use of mobile work zone safety enforcement systems in lane-restricted work zones to enforce violations of section 3112(b) (relating to traffic-control signals) in accordance with this section.(c) Authorization.--(1) The department may authorize the use of a mobile 1234567891011121314151617181920 work zone safety enforcement system on any State-designated highway in a lane-restricted work zone.(2) The Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission may authorize the use of a mobile work zone safety enforcement system on any portion of the Pennsylvania Turnpike in a lane-restricted work zone.(3) Subject to subsection (d), a municipality may authorize the use of a mobile work zone safety enforcement system on any highway under the jurisdiction of the municipality in a lane-restricted work zone.(d) Municipal requirements.--Prior to the use of a mobile work zone safety enforcement system in a lane-restricted work zone on a highway under the jurisdiction of a municipality, and except as provided in subsection (e), the municipality must:(1) Enact a local ordinance authorizing the general use of mobile work zone safety enforcement systems in lane-restricted work zones on highways under the jurisdiction of the municipality.(2) Transmit a copy of the ordinance to the department.(3) Provide a statement of policy to the department outlining the criteria the municipality will use when determining when the use of a mobile work zone safety enforcement system in a lane-restricted work zone is appropriate.(4) Provide documentation to the department, as determined by the department, demonstrating that:(i) the mobile work zone safety enforcement system used by the municipality complies with this section and has been approved by the department under subsection (p);(ii) the municipality shall comply with this 20260HB2628PN3592 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section; and(iii) the system administrator, if applicable, on the municipality's behalf shall comply with this section.(5) Provide documentation that the municipality has entered into an agreement with a police department for the review of violations in accordance with subsection (l).(6) Receive approval from the department to operate a mobile work zone safety enforcement system on a highway under the jurisdiction of the municipality in a lane-restricted work zone.(e) Exception.--If the department or the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission authorizes the use of a mobile work zone safety enforcement system in a lane-restricted work zone that includes both a highway under the jurisdiction of the department or the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission and a local highway under the jurisdiction of a municipality, the department or the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission may authorize the use of a mobile work zone safety enforcement system in the lane-restricted work zone regardless of whether the portion of the highway under the jurisdiction of the municipality is located in a municipality that has been approved to operate a mobile work zone safety enforcement system under subsection (d).(f) Construction.--Nothing contained in subsection (d) shall be construed to require a municipality to identify individual lane-restricted work zones on a specific highway that the municipality intends to use a mobile work zone safety enforcement system or require the municipality to receive prior approval for each individual lane-restricted work zone in which the municipality intends to use a mobile work zone safety enforcement system.20260HB2628PN3592 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (g) Work zone requirements.--(1) Not less than one warning sign shall be conspicuously placed before the lane-restricted work zone notifying the public that a mobile work zone safety enforcement system is in use. The sign shall:(i) be in conformance with Federal regulations and be of a size and design determined by the department; and(ii) clearly and accurately indicate if the mobile work zone safety enforcement system is active and in use.(2) The location as to where a driver of a vehicle shall stop the vehicle when the work zone traffic signal indicates a steady red signal shall be indicated by a conspicuously placed sign in conformance with Federal regulations and requirements established by the department.(h) Violation.--(1) A motor vehicle in violation of section 3112(b) that proceeds past the stopping location designated under subsection (g)(2) when a mobile work zone safety enforcement system indicates a steady red light is in violation of this section.(2) A motor vehicle may not be considered in violation of this section under paragraph (1) unless all of the following criteria are met:(i) The mobile work zone safety enforcement system indicated a steady red light prior to any portion of the vehicle proceeding past the stopping location designated under subsection (g)(2).(ii) The entirety of the motor vehicle proceeded past the stopping location designated under subsection (g)(2) after the work zone traffic signal enforcement 20260HB2628PN3592 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 system indicated a steady red light.(iii) A steady yellow light was indicated by the mobile work zone safety enforcement system prior to the steady red light, and the steady yellow light was indicated for the minimum time period as determined by the department.(i) Owner liability.--For each violation under subsection (h), the owner of the motor vehicle shall be liable for the penalty imposed under subsection (j) unless the owner is convicted of the same violation under section 3112 or has a defense under subsection (o). For the purposes of this section, the lessee of a leased vehicle shall be considered the owner of a motor vehicle.(j) Penalty.--(1) The penalty for a violation under this section shall be a fine of $200.(2) The fine under paragraph (1) shall not be subject to 42 Pa.C.S. § 3571 (relating to Commonwealth portion of fines, etc.) or 3573 (relating to municipal corporation portion of fines, etc.) or any other surcharges or fines not specifically authorized by this section.(3) The fine under paragraph (1) is not authorized during any time that a roadway lane in a lane-restricted work zone is not shared by opposing travel of vehicular traffic.(4) A penalty imposed under this section may not:(i) be deemed a criminal conviction;(ii) be made part of the operating record of the individual upon whom the penalty is imposed under section 1535 (relating to schedule of convictions and points);(iii) be the subject of merit rating for insurance 20260HB2628PN3592 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purposes; or(iv) authorize imposition of surcharge points in the provision of motor vehicle insurance coverage.(k) Violation.--A notice of violation shall be sent to the owner of a vehicle in violation of this section in accordance with the following:(1) An action to enforce this section shall be initiated by an administrative notice of violation to the owner of a motor vehicle identified by a mobile work zone safety enforcement system as violating this section. A notice of violation based upon inspection of recorded images produced by an automated speed enforcement system and sworn or affirmed by a police officer in accordance with subsection (m) shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained in the notice.(2) The notice of violation must include written verification that the mobile work zone safety enforcement system was operating correctly at the time of the alleged violation and the date of the most recent inspection that confirms the mobile work zone safety enforcement system to be operating properly.(3) The mobile work zone safety enforcement system operator shall complete training offered by the manufacturer or vendor of the mobile work zone safety enforcement system, including training on any devices critical to the operation of the system, or the manufacturer's or vendor's representative in the procedures for setting up, testing and operating of a mobile work zone safety enforcement system. Upon completion of the training, the manufacturer or vendor or manufacturer's or vendor's representative shall issue a 20260HB2628PN3592 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 signed certificate to the mobile work zone safety enforcement system operator, which shall be admitted as evidence in any court proceeding for a violation involving a mobile work zone safety enforcement system. A mobile work zone safety enforcement system operator shall create an electronic record, which shall:(i) state the date, time and location of the system setup;(ii) state that the mobile work zone safety enforcement system operator successfully performed the mobile work zone safety enforcement system and passed the self-tests specified by the manufacturer or vendor of the mobile work zone safety enforcement system;(iii) be kept on file; and(iv) be admitted in any proceeding for a violation involving a mobile work zone safety enforcement system.(4) A mobile work zone safety enforcement system shall undergo an annual calibration check. A signed certificate of calibration shall be issued after the annual calibration check, which shall be kept on file and shall be admitted as evidence in any proceeding for a violation involving a mobile work zone safety enforcement system.(5) The following shall be attached to the notice of violation:(i) A copy of the recorded image showing the motor vehicle with its license plate visible.(ii) The registration number and state of issuance of the motor vehicle registration.(iii) Verification that the mobile work zone safety enforcement system was operating correctly at the time of 20260HB2628PN3592 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the alleged violation and the date of the most recent inspection that confirms the mobile work zone safety enforcement system to be operating properly.(iv) The date, time and place of the alleged violation.(v) Notice that the violation charged is under this section.(vi) Instructions for return of the notice of violation.(6) In the case of a violation involving a motor vehicle subject to the laws of this Commonwealth, the notice of violation shall be mailed within 30 days after the commission of the violation or within 30 days after the discovery of the identity of the owner, whichever is later, to the address of the owner as listed in the records of the department.(7) In the case of a violation involving a motor vehicle from a jurisdiction other than this Commonwealth, the notice of violation shall be mailed within 30 days after the discovery of the identity of the owner to the address of the owner as listed in the records of the official in the jurisdiction having charge of the registration of the vehicle.(8) A notice of violation shall be invalid unless provided to the owner within 90 days of the offense.(9) The notice shall include the following text:This notice shall be returned personally, by mail or by an agent duly authorized in writing, within 30 days of the mailing date of the notice. A hearing may be obtained upon the written request of the owner.(10) A notice of violation must be sent by first class 20260HB2628PN3592 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 mail. A manual or automatic record of mailing prepared by the system administrator in the ordinary course of business shall be prima facie evidence of mailing and shall be admissible in a judicial or administrative proceeding as to the facts contained in the notice.(l) Agreements.--The department, the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission or a municipality may enter into an agreement with a system administrator to initiate actions to enforce this section through a mobile work zone safety enforcement system, to which the following shall apply:(1) An agreement entered into under this subsection by a municipality shall be approved by a vote of the governing body of the municipality. The meeting to consider approval of a mobile work zone safety enforcement system shall be properly noticed under 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(2) A municipality may only enforce this section if the municipality has a written intergovernmental agreement with a primary police department.(3) The department or the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission may only enforce this section if the department or the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission has a written intergovernmental agreement with the Pennsylvania State Police.(4) Compensation under an agreement shall not require a minimum or maximum number of violations to be issued that would impact the compensation to the system administrator.(5) The department, the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, a municipality or the system administrator on their behalf, shall provide notice through a publicly 20260HB2628PN3592 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accessible Internet website that provides guidance and information related to the system, including, but not limited to, the appeals process and contact information. The website shall remain publicly accessible throughout the period of use of the mobile work zone safety enforcement system.(6) The department, the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission or a municipality or a system administrator on behalf of the department, Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission or municipality shall establish an electronic system where program information and all violations, in conformance with this section, can be accessed and viewed by:(i) The primary police department.(ii) The department's hearing officer for conducting appeals.(7) The department, the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission or a municipality or a system administrator on behalf of the department, Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission or municipality may utilize an alternative system to share program information and all violations if the electronic system is unavailable for any legitimate purpose.(8) The department may randomly conduct audits of a municipality or a system administrator to ensure compliance with this section as determined by the department. If the department conducts an audit, the department shall prepare a summary of the audit, which shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(m) Police review.--(1) A certificate of violation, including a facsimile of a certificate of violation, based upon inspection of recorded images produced by a mobile work zone safety enforcement 20260HB2628PN3592 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 system and sworn to or affirmed by a primary police department shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it. The department, the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission or a municipality or a system administrator on behalf of the department, Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission or municipality must include written documentation that the mobile work zone safety enforcement system was operating correctly at the time of the alleged violation. A recorded image evidencing a violation of this section shall be admissible in any judicial or administrative proceeding to adjudicate the liability for the violation of this section.(2) The department, the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission or a municipality or the system administrator on behalf of the department, Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission or municipality shall submit the following information regarding a violation of this section to the primary police department using an electronic system:(i) A copy of the recorded image or images showing the motor vehicle allegedly violating this section.(ii) The license plate number and state of issuance of the motor vehicle.(iii) The date, time and place of the alleged violation.(3) Upon receipt of violation information under paragraph (2), a primary police department shall:(i) Review submitted evidence to determine if a violation under this section occurred and electronically certify the notice of violation.(ii) Notify the entity that submitted the violation of the electronic certification of the notice of 20260HB2628PN3592 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 violation related to the primary police department's capacity to view and authorize the notice.(iii) Restrict the review of submitted evidence under subparagraph (i) to an individual who is a police officer.(n) Limitations.--(1) Recorded images collected as part of a mobile work zone safety enforcement system may record only violations of this section and may not be used for any other surveillance purposes. This paragraph shall not preclude a court of competent jurisdiction from issuing an order directing that the information be provided to law enforcement officials if the information is requested solely in connection with a criminal law enforcement action and is reasonably described.(2) Information gathered and maintained under this section that is kept by the Commonwealth or a municipality, its authorized agents or its employees, including recorded images, written records, motor vehicle information, reports or facsimiles, names and addresses shall be for the exclusive purpose of discharging duties required under this section. The information shall not be deemed a public record under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law. The information shall not be discoverable by court order or otherwise or be admissible as evidence in a proceeding except to determine liability under this section. This paragraph shall not preclude a court of competent jurisdiction from issuing an order directing that the information be provided to law enforcement officials if the information is requested solely in connection with a criminal law enforcement action and is reasonably described.20260HB2628PN3592 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Recorded images obtained through the use of mobile work zone safety enforcement systems deployed as a means of promoting traffic safety in lane-restricted work zones shall be destroyed within one year of final disposition of a notice of violation, except that images subject to a court order under paragraph (1) or (2) shall be destroyed within two years after the date of the order, unless further extended by court order. The department, the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, a municipality or the system administrator shall retain evidence that the records have been destroyed in accordance with this section.(4) Motor vehicle owner information obtained as a result of the operation of a mobile work zone safety enforcement system under this section shall be the exclusive property of the Commonwealth or a municipality and not the property of the system administrator, manufacturer or vendor of the mobile work zone safety enforcement system and may not be used for a purpose other than prescribed in this section.(5) An intentional violation of this subsection shall constitute a misdemeanor of the third degree punishable by a $500 fine. Each violation shall constitute a separate and distinct offense.(o) Defenses.--It shall be a defense under this section that the:(1) Motor vehicle was reported to a police department as stolen prior to the time the violation occurred and was not recovered prior to that time.(2) Person receiving the notice of violation was not the owner of the motor vehicle at the time of the offense.(3) Mobile work zone safety enforcement system being 20260HB2628PN3592 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 used to determine the violation was not in compliance with this section and any regulations established by the department with respect to testing for accuracy, certification or calibration.(4) Person named in the notice of the violation was not driving the motor vehicle at the time of the violation. The department or the system administrator may require the owner to submit evidence that the owner was not the driver at the time of the alleged violation. The owner of the motor vehicle may not be required to disclose the identity of the driver of the motor vehicle at the time of the violation.(p) Authority and duties.--The department and Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission shall establish a mobile work zone safety enforcement system program, to which the following shall apply:(1) The department, in consultation with the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, shall promulgate regulations for the certification and use of a mobile work zone safety enforcement system in accordance with this section.(2) A municipality that authorizes the use of a mobile work zone safety enforcement system in lane-restricted work zones under the municipality's jurisdiction shall comply with regulations established by the department under this section.(3) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this subsection, regulations promulgated by the department under this section during the three years following the effective date of this paragraph shall be deemed temporary regulations, which shall expire upon the prompt promulgation of final regulations or three years following the effective date of this paragraph, whichever shall occur sooner. The 20260HB2628PN3592 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 temporary regulations shall not be subject to:(i) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(ii) Section 204(b) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iii) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(4) The department, Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission and applicable municipality shall serve directly or through a contracted private service with a manufacturer or vendor as the system administrator of the program. Compensation under a contract authorized by this paragraph shall be based only upon the value of equipment and services provided or rendered in support of the mobile work zone safety enforcement system program and may not be based on the quantity of notices of violation issued or amount of fines imposed or generated.(5) The system administrator shall prepare and issue notices of violation.(6) No mobile work zone safety enforcement system may be used without the system being approved by the department, which shall have the authority to promulgate regulations for the certification and use of a system.(q) Payment of fine.--An owner of a motor vehicle may admit responsibility for the violation and pay the fine provided in the notice personally, through an authorized agent, electronically or by mailing both payment and the notice of violation to the system administrator. The following shall apply:20260HB2628PN3592 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Payment by mail may be made only by money order, credit card or check made payable to the Commonwealth, the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, the municipality or the system administrator, as applicable.(2) Payment of the fine shall operate as a final disposition of the case.(3) If payment is not received within 90 days of the mailing of the notice of violation, the department, Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission or the municipality may request an applicable credit collection agency to resolve the payment amount owed.(r) Contest.--An owner of a motor vehicle may, within 30 days of the mailing date of the notice, request a hearing to contest liability by appearing before the system administrator either personally or by an authorized agent or by sending a request on the prescribed form, to which the following shall apply:(1) A hearing to contest liability may be in person or be conducted through live-stream synchronous video conferencing or similar virtual presence technology.(2) The system administrator shall provide an appropriate form by which owners of the motor vehicles may challenge a notice of violation.(3) Upon receipt of a hearing request, the system administrator shall in a timely manner schedule the matter before a hearing officer designated by the department. Written notice of the date, time and place of hearing must be presented or sent by first class mail to the owner of the motor vehicle. The department shall conduct hearings for contests of violations under this section regardless of 20260HB2628PN3592 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 whether the violation was issued under a mobile work zone safety enforcement system administered by the department, the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission or a municipality.(4) The hearing shall be informal and the rules of evidence shall not apply. The decision of the department's hearing officer shall be made within 45 days from the hearing date and shall be final, subject to the right of the owner of the motor vehicle to appeal the decision under paragraph (5).(5) If, within 45 days of issuance of the decision of the department's hearing officer, the owner of the motor vehicle requests in writing an appeal of the decision of the hearing officer, the owner of the motor vehicle shall file the notice of violation and supporting documents with the office of the magisterial district judge for the magisterial district where the violation occurred, and a magisterial district judge shall hear and decide the matter de novo and shall be restricted to finding an owner liable or not liable for violating this section.(6) The Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission or municipality or the system administrator on the Pennsylvania Turnpike's or municipality's behalf shall reimburse the department for the actual cost of the hearing officer designated under paragraph (3).(s) Revenue.--(1) Of each fine collected under this section, $50 shall be provided to the primary police department that reviewed the submitted evidence for the violation.(2) After the disbursement of fine revenue under paragraph (1), fine revenue collected by a municipality, or by the system administrator on the municipality's behalf, 20260HB2628PN3592 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be used to pay for the administration of the program and the system administrator's invoice costs. Any remaining revenue shall be used by the municipality for the maintenance, construction or reconstruction of highways or bridges owned by the municipality.(3) After the disbursement of fine revenue under paragraph (1), fine revenue collected by the department or the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, or by the system administrator on their behalf, shall be deposited into the appropriate restricted account under paragraph (4).(4) Two restricted accounts are established in the State Treasury for fines remitted under this section to the department and Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, respectively. The system administrator of the department or Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, if any, shall send an invoice to the department or Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, respectively, for the services provided. Money in the accounts are appropriated on a continuing basis to the department and the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, respectively. The department or Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission shall use the appropriate restricted account to pay for the administration of the program and the system administrator's invoice costs, if applicable. Remaining fines shall be allocated by the department or Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission to develop a Work Zone and Highway Safety Program.(t) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Lane-restricted work zone." A work zone, as classified under the most recent Federal Manual on Uniform Traffic Control 20260HB2628PN3592 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Devices adopted by the department, regardless of whether workers are present, established for construction, maintenance or utility work on or adjacent to a street, highway or other roadway, in which one or more lanes of traffic are restricted, controlled or redirected."Mobile work zone safety enforcement system" or "system." A camera system temporarily installed in a lane-restricted work zone to direct motor vehicle traffic in one or more lanes on a highway and is equipped with a traffic signal, a gate and at least one camera and one computer, tablet or similar device that produces recorded video and two or more photographic still images of a motor vehicle being used or operated in a manner that violates this section."Municipality." A city, borough or township of this Commonwealth."Primary police department." As follows:(1) For a municipality, either of the following:(i) The police department of the municipality that has the authority to issue citations for violations of this title.(ii) The Pennsylvania State Police if the municipality does not have a police department with authority to issue citations for violations of this title, at the sole discretion of the Pennsylvania State Police.(2) For the department or the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, the Pennsylvania State Police."System administrator." A person that creates, owns or has a license or permission to sell, lease, distribute or administer a mobile work zone safety enforcement system, consistent with the 20260HB2628PN3592 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements of this section, is under agreement with a municipality, the department or the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission to perform, but not be limited to, the following:(1) Provide for the installation, operation and maintenance of a mobile work zone safety enforcement system in a lane-restricted work zone.(2) Administer the enforcement of a violation of this section through a mobile work zone safety enforcement system on the department's, Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission's or a municipality's behalf as permitted by this section, including maintaining and transmitting records, mailing violation notices, processing violations, collecting fines and administering contests of violations.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20260HB2628PN3592 - 20 - 1234567891011121314